Utah statutes.
53A-6-802.   Paraeducator to Teacher Scholarship Program.

(1)  The Paraeducator to Teacher Scholarship Program is created to award scholarships to paraeducators for education and training to become licensed teachers.

(2)  The State Board of Education shall use money appropriated for the Paraeducator to Teacher Scholarship Program to award scholarships of up to $5,000 to paraeducators employed by school districts and charter schools who are pursuing an associate's degree or bachelor's degree program to become a licensed teacher.

(3)  A paraeducator is eligible to receive a scholarship if:

(a)  the paraeducator is employed by a school district or charter school;

(b)  is admitted to, or has made an application to, an associate's degree program or bachelor's degree program that will prepare the paraeducator for teacher licensure; and

(c)  the principal at the school where the paraeducator is employed has nominated the paraeducator for a scholarship.

(4) (a)  The State Board of Education shall establish a committee to select scholarship recipients from nominations submitted by school principals.

(b)  The committee shall include representatives of the State Board of Education, State Board of Regents, and the general public, excluding school district and charter school employees.

(c)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(i)  Section 63A-3-106;

(ii)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(iii)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(d)  The committee shall select scholarship recipients based on the following criteria:

(i)  test scores, grades, or other evidence demonstrating the applicant's ability to successfully complete a teacher education program; and

(ii)  the applicant's record of success as a paraeducator.

(5)  The maximum scholarship amount is $5,000.

(6)  Scholarship money may only be used to pay for tuition costs:

(a)  of:

(i)  an associate's degree program that fulfills credit requirements for the first two years of a bachelor's degree program leading to teacher licensure; or

(ii)  the first two years of a bachelor's degree program leading to teacher licensure; and

(b)  at a higher education institution:

(i)  located in Utah; and

(ii)  accredited by the Northwest Commission on Colleges and Universities.

(7)  A scholarship recipient must be continuously employed as a paraeducator by a school district or charter school while pursuing a degree using scholarship money.

(8)  The State Board of Education shall make rules in accordance with this section and Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to administer the Paraeducator to Teacher Scholarship Program, including rules establishing:

(a)  scholarship application procedures;

(b)  the number of, and qualifications for, committee members who select scholarship recipients; and

(c)  procedures for distributing scholarship money.



Amended by Chapter 286, 2010 General Session

